Illinois, session 104th, SB2215.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Act is amended 5by adding Section 8.5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2305/8.5 new)7    Sec. 8.5. Information for distribution concerning 8fertility options. 9    (a) As used in this Section, "health care professional" 10means a physician licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 111987, a podiatrist licensed under the Podiatric Medical 12Practice Act of 1987, an advanced practice registered nurse 13licensed under the Nurse Practice Act, or a physician 14assistant licensed under the Physician Assistant Practice Act 15of 1987.16    (b) The Department of Public Health shall provide the 17following clinical, evidence-based information to health care 18professionals that may be distributed to women over the age of 1925 years, or women interested in information about future 20fertility, including, but not limited to:21        (1) a description of the factors impacting fertility, 22    including the ovarian reserve;23        (2) an overview of different types of means to assess   SB2215 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11361 BDA 21449 b1    fertility, including ovarian reserve testing and the 2    limitations of the tests; and3        (3) information on potential results and resources 4    that are available after testing and any additional 5    information that should be considered by a patient 6    undergoing the test.